Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-622
Airport authority; applicability of sections.

Sections 3-610 to 3-621 shall be full authority for the creation of airport authorities by counties, and for the exercise of powers therein granted to counties and to such authorities, and no action, proceeding or election shall be required prior to the creation of such airport authorities other than those provided for in sections 3-610 to 3-621.

Laws 1969, c. 141, § 22, p. 663.